Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.856

Faculty tenure—Evaluation of probationer by review committee—Progress report, acknowledgment of receipt—Recommendation as to tenure.

The probationary faculty appointment period shall be one of continuing evaluation of a probationer by a review committee. The evaluation process shall place primary importance upon the probationer's effectiveness in his or her appointment. The review committee shall periodically advise each probationer, in writing, of his or her progress during the probationary period and receive the probationer's written acknowledgment thereof. The review committee shall at appropriate times make recommendations to the appointing authority as to whether tenure should or should not be granted to individual probationers: PROVIDED, That the final decision to award or withhold tenure shall rest with the appointing authority, after it has given reasonable consideration to the recommendations of the review committee.

[ 2011 c 336 s 741; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 36. Formerly RCW 28.85.856.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.